District of Columbia statutes.
47-1311

Duties of Assessor — Preparation of list of sold property.

It shall be the duty of the Assessor for the District of Columbia to prepare and keep in his office, for public inspection, a list of all real estate in the District of Columbia heretofore sold, or which may hereafter be sold, for the nonpayment of any general or special tax or assessment levied or assessed upon the same, said list to show the date of sale and for what taxes sold; in whose name assessed at the time of sale; the amount for which the same was sold; when and to whom conveyed if deeded, or, if redeemed from said sale, the date of redemption.

Feb. 6, 1879, 20 Stat. 283, ch. 50
May 13, 1892, 27 Stat. 37, ch. 74
Mar. 3, 1917, 39 Stat. 1005, ch. 160
June 25, 1938, 52 Stat. 1202, ch. 702, § 11
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1311.
1973 Ed., § 47-1010.
Office of Assessor abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-413.